Utah, session 2026, SB109.
Section 1. Section 78B-3-1301 is enacted to read:13. Abolished Rights of Action78B-3-1301. Definitions for part.Reserved.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 78B-3-1302 is enacted to read:78B-3-1302. Alienation of affections.There is no right of action for alienation of affections.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 5, 2027.